Maine, session 132, LD1301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4304, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Use of artificial intelligence. Beginning January 1, 2026, the use of artificial
intelligence by a carrier, or by any 3rd party contracted by a carrier, to make medical review
or utilization review determinations relating to the approval, denial, delay, modification or
adjustment of coverage for services under a health plan is governed by this subsection.
A. Determinations derived from the use of artificial intelligence, including algorithms
and other software tools, must:
(1) Be based upon an enrollee's medical history, as applicable, and individual
clinical circumstances as presented by the requesting provider, as well as other
relevant clinical information contained in the enrollee's medical record, and not
supplant provider decision making;
(2) Not directly or indirectly discriminate against an enrollee on the basis of race,
color, religion, national origin, ancestry, age, sex, gender, gender identity, gender
expression, sexual orientation, present or predicted disability, expected length of
life, degree of medical dependency, quality of life or other health conditions;
(3) Be fairly and equitably applied; and
(4) Be open to inspection, and the use of artificial intelligence must be disclosed in
the written policies and procedures to an enrollee.
Use of artificial intelligence pursuant to this paragraph must be governed by policies
that establish accountability for performance, use and outcomes that are reviewed and
revised for accuracy and reliability. Data under this paragraph may not be used beyond
its intended and stated purpose. Data under this paragraph must be protected from risk
that may directly or indirectly cause harm to the enrollee.
B. A denial, delay, modification or adjustment of health care services based on medical
necessity must be made by a clinical peer competent to evaluate the specific clinical
issues involved in the health care services requested by the enrollee's provider. The
clinical peer making the medical review or utilization review determination shall
consider the enrollee's provider's recommendation and the enrollee's medical history,
as applicable, and individual clinical circumstances.
For purposes of this subsection, "artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-
based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit
objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence
physical or virtual environments.